Louisiana, session 2026, SB34.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2522 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2522. Missing person alerts; adults and children with disabilities
A. An AMBER Alert shall be activated for abduction cases involving
children seventeen years of age or under when the circumstances indicate the
child is in danger of serious bodily harm or death and there is sufficient
descriptive information about the child, abductor, or suspect's vehicle.
B. If a case involving a missing child does not meet AMBER Alert
criteria, a Level II Endangered Missing Child Advisory may be issued by the
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 34 ENROLLED
office of state police.
C. A Level II Endangered Missing Child Advisory shall be identified as
"Bryan's Call" if the missing child is:
(1) Aged seventeen or younger.
(2) Not a risk to the general public.
(3) Believed to be diagnosed with any of the following:
(a) A developmental or cognitive impairment, including but not limited
to autism spectrum disorder (ASD), traumatic brain injury (TBI), Down
syndrome, or Sanfilippo syndrome.
(b) An irreversible deterioration of intellectual faculties that makes them
unable to meet their own needs or to seek help without assistance.
D. In addition to the procedures established pursuant to R.S. 40:2530.1
et seq., a Silver Alert shall be identified as a "Bryan's Call" if the missing
person is:
(1) Aged eighteen or older.
(2) Not a risk to the general public.
(3) Believed to be diagnosed with any of the following:
(a) A developmental or cognitive impairment, including but not limited
to autism spectrum disorder (ASD), traumatic brain injury (TBI), Down
syndrome, or Sanfilippo syndrome.
(b) An irreversible deterioration of intellectual faculties that makes them
unable to meet their own needs or to seek help without assistance.
E. A local law enforcement agency with the capability to issue an alert
shall issue one immediately upon receipt of a report of a missing person or child
provided for in Subsection C or D of this Section. If the local law enforcement
agency does not have the capability to issue an alert, the agency shall
immediately contact the office of state police to issue the alert. Local law
enforcement shall make a reasonable effort to determine whether the
appropriate alert type is an AMBER Alert, Level II Endangered Missing Child
Advisory, or Silver Alert. However, the office of state police shall make the final
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 34 ENROLLED
determination of the appropriate alert type.
F. If state police receives a request that involves a missing person or child
provided for in Subsection C or D of this Section, and the time of the receipt is
no more than seventy-two hours since the person or child went missing, the
office of state police shall issue an alert providing rapid dissemination of
information using a wireless emergency alert either statewide or locally
regarding the missing person or child. The office of state police shall make every
effort to disseminate the information as quickly as possible when a person's or
child's status as missing has been reported to a local law enforcement agency.
G. The office of state police shall make training available to first
responders, upon request, on responses to reports of missing persons or
children, whether the case involves an abduction, child endangerment, or
individuals with cognitive or developmental disabilities, including the utilization
of applicable alert systems.
H.(1) Any state police officer, members of other law enforcement entities,
radio or television broadcasters, or cable television operators, who transmit or
display, or who fail to transmit or display such information concerning a
missing child, and other entities who may become an active component of this
effort, shall not be liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties as a result
of any acts or omissions relative to the Level II Endangered Missing Child
Advisory.
(2) Any state police officer, members of other law enforcement entities,
radio or television broadcasters, or cable television operators, who transmit or
display, or who fail to transmit or display such information concerning a
missing person, and other entities who may become an active component of this
effort, shall not be liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties as a result
of any acts or omissions relative to the identification of the alert as a "Bryan's
Call".
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 34 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.